Hawaii statutes.
[§340E-4.7] Notification to users of
potential lead contamination. Before June 19, 1988, every public
water system shall identify and provide notice to persons that may be affected
by lead contamination of their drinking water where such contamination results
from either the lead content in the construction materials of the public water
distribution system or corrosivity of the water supply sufficient to cause
leaching of lead, or both. The notice shall provide a clear and readily
understandable explanation of the following:

(1) The potential sources of lead in the drinking
water;

(2) The potential adverse health effects;

(3) The reasonably available methods of mitigating
known or potential lead content in drinking water;

(4) Any steps the system is taking to mitigate lead
content in drinking water; and

(5) The necessity for seeking alternative water
supplies, if any.

The failure to comply with the notification
required in this section shall subject the supplier of water to the same
penalties under section 340E-6. [L 1987, c 165, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next